North Carolina, session 2025, HB1056.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ALLOW RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT IN ALL COMMERCIAL ZONES
SECTION 1.1. Article 7 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
*H1056-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 160D-707. Residential development allowed in all commercial zones.
(a) In all areas and districts zoned for commercial use, a local government shall allow
residential development by right at a density and intensity no less than that allowed in the least
restrictive residential zoning district in the jurisdiction in which residential development is
permitted by right.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to areas zoned for industrial use or
to supersede or diminish any applicable building code, fire code, or other general public health
and safety regulations or other building design elements generally applicable to residential
development."
SECTION 1.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2027, and applies to permit
applications submitted on or after that date.

PART II. PROHIBIT PARKING MINIMUMS
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 160D-702 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-702. Grant of power.
…
(c) A zoning or other development regulation shall not do any of the following:
(1) Set a minimum square footage of any structures subject to regulation under
the North Carolina Residential Code.
(2) Require a or otherwise establish a minimum size, placement, configuration,
allocation, location, or number of parking space to be larger than 9 feet wide
by 20 feet long unless the parking space is designated for handicap, parallel,
or diagonal parking.spaces, except as required by the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101, et seq., as amended, or federal
regulations promulgated under that Act.
(3) Require additional fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or
two-family dwellings that are not in compliance with the required number of
fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or two-family dwellings
set forth in the Fire Code of the North Carolina Residential Code for One- and
Two-Family Dwellings.
…."
SECTION 2.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2027, and applies to ordinances
and regulations enacted or amended on or after that date.

PART III. SUPPORT LOCAL GOVERNMENT PERMITTING
SECTION 3.1. Chapter 122A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 122A-5.16. Municipal Housing Approval Acceleration Program.
(a) As used in this section, "residential development application" means an application
submitted to a local government for the approvals required for the construction of residential
dwelling units or the conversion of buildings or portions of buildings into residential dwelling
units. This definition includes rezonings, subdivision approvals, site plan approvals, special use
permits, and building permits, but excludes post-construction ministerial reviews such as
inspections and certificates of occupancy.
(b) The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall establish and administer the
Municipal Housing Approval Acceleration Program to reimburse eligible local governments up
to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) for eligible documented costs incurred to accelerate
the review and disposition of residential development applications, including approval, denial,
and other final action. The Agency shall do all of the following:
(1) Develop performance reimbursement limits and eligibility guidelines in
consultation with the North Carolina League of Municipalities, taking into
Page 2 House Bill 1056-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
consideration geography, market conditions, and local capacity. The
eligibility guidelines must clearly define and explain which local governments
may apply for performance reimbursement under this Program and for which
categories of documented costs.
(2) Develop a standardized reporting form for local governments to use in
applying for performance reimbursement. The form must require a local
government to include all of the following from the year in which it is applying
for reimbursement:
a. Total number of residential development applications received.
b. Number of residential development applications that have been
approved or denied or remain pending.
c. Processing time lines for approvals.
d. Amount of eligible costs incurred in granting approvals, identified by
category.
e. Documentation of eligible costs.
(3) Annually review completed applications for performance reimbursement as
described in subdivision (2) of this subsection and reimburse local
governments in accordance with the Agency's established reimbursement
limits. Performance reimbursement amounts may exceed one hundred percent
(100%), up to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%), on an individualized
basis. The Agency shall consider all of the following local factors in
determining whether to reimburse a local government more than one hundred
percent (100%):
a. Constrained fiscal capacity.
b. Constrained staffing availability in rural or small jurisdictions.
c. High-growth or high-cost housing markets.
d. Extensive reduction in processing time lines for approvals.
e. High number of approvals.
f. Adoption of best-practice reforms that materially accelerate residential
development and housing production.
(c) Application. – To receive performance reimbursement for eligible costs, eligible local
governments shall first apply to the Agency for reimbursement using the standardized reporting
form described in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Funds. – The Agency shall use funds appropriated to it for this Program only as
provided in this section.
(e) Quarterly Report. – The Agency shall report quarterly to the Joint Legislative
Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research
Division on all of the following:
(1) Total funds obligated and disbursed.
(2) Categories of eligible costs being reimbursed.
(3) Identification of local governments receiving performance reimbursement.
(4) Total number of residential development applications processed by each local
government receiving performance reimbursement.
(5) Number of residential development applications that have been approved or
denied or remain pending for each local government receiving performance
reimbursement.
(6) Average processing time lines for approvals for each local government
receiving performance reimbursement before and after participating in the
Program.
(7) Any reduction observed by the Agency in processing time lines for approvals
attributable to the Program."
House Bill 1056-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2027.

PART IV. PRESERVE SINGLE-FAMILY HOMEOWNERSHIP
SECTION 4.1. Chapter 75 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 9.
"Preservation of Single-Family Homeownership.
"§ 75-146. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Affiliate. – A business entity that wholly or substantially owns, is wholly or
substantially owned by, or is under common ownership or control with and
that acts directly or indirectly on behalf of, in concert with, or for the benefit
of another corporate buyer.
(2) Business entity. – A corporation, limited liability company, partnership, real
estate investment trust, association, joint venture, fund, trust, or other legal
entity, whether organized for profit or not for profit, but excluding a
governmental entity.
(3) Corporate buyer. – An individual or business entity who acquires or holds title
to a single-family home for any purpose other than owner-occupancy.
(4) Owner-occupant. – An individual who acquires or holds title to a
single-family home and who occupies, or intends in good faith to occupy, the
home as the individual's primary residence.
(5) Single-family home. – A residential structure that is either a fully detached or
semi-detached building or that is a row or town home that (i) is separate from
any adjacent unit by a ground-to-roof wall, (ii) does not share heating or
air-conditioning systems or utilities, and (iii) does not have dwelling units
located above or below.
"§ 75-147. Legislative findings and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) The availability of single-family homes for owner-occupancy is vital to the
health, safety, welfare, and prosperity of the people of this State.
(2) Homeownership remains one of the principal means by which households
build equity, accumulate intergenerational wealth, achieve residential
stability, and participate fully in the economic and civic life of their
communities.
(3) Single-family homes are distinct from other forms of real property in that they
are traditionally intended to serve as the primary residences of individuals and
families, rather than as a large-scale financial asset class.
(4) The large-scale acquisition and holding of single-family homes by corporate,
institutional, and other business entities for rental or speculative purposes can
reduce the supply of homes available for owner-occupants, intensify
competition for entry-level and moderate-cost homes, and contribute to the
displacement of prospective homebuyers by portfolio purchasers.
(5) When substantial numbers of single-family homes are converted from
opportunities for family ownership into instruments of large-scale rent
extraction, the State suffers not only economic harm, but social and civic harm
through reduced neighborhood stability, diminished opportunities for wealth
formation, and increased dependence of residents upon concentrated private
market power for basic housing.
(6) Single-family homes should, as a matter of public policy, be preserved
primarily for ownership and occupancy by individuals and families and should
Page 4 House Bill 1056-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
not be subject to indefinite aggregation by large-scale landlord interests or
accumulated at scale by corporate buyers whose principal purpose is to hold
such homes as rental inventory, speculative inventory, or other investment
assets.
(b) Therefore, the purpose of this Article is to protect the single-family housing market
from excessive concentration, preserve meaningful opportunities for owner-occupancy, deter the
treatment of single-family homes as a large-scale commodity class, and promote the broad
distribution of the benefits of homeownership among the people of North Carolina.
"§ 75-148. Prohibited large-scale acquisition of single-family homes.
(a) It is unlawful for a corporate buyer to purchase, acquire, or otherwise obtain an
ownership interest in a single-family home in this State if, upon consummation of the transaction,
that corporate buyer would own, lease-purchase, control, or hold a beneficial interest in more
than 25 single-family homes in this State that are used primarily for rental, speculative, or other
non-owner-occupancy purposes.
(b) For purposes of this section, homes owned or controlled by affiliates are aggregated.
(c) A purchase made in violation of this section is an unfair or deceptive act or practice
affecting commerce under G.S. 75-1.1.
"§ 75-149. Exemptions.
This Article does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A single-family home acquired by devise, descent, or other inheritance.
(2) A single-family home acquired by a lender, loan servicer, or governmental
entity through foreclosure, deed in lieu of foreclosure, enforcement of a
security interest, tax foreclosure, or similar process, provided the acquiring
party does not retain the home for rental or speculative purposes longer than
24 months after acquisition.
(3) A single-family home acquired, in whole or majority part, by a nonprofit
organization, community land trust, or public housing-related entity for the
purpose of affordable homeownership, transitional housing, community
stabilization, or other public or charitable housing purpose.
(4) A builder or developer acquiring, constructing, or holding a single-family
home in the ordinary course of development for initial sale to an
owner-occupant, and not for long-term rental portfolio purposes.
(5) An individual acting in the individual's own name for personal, family, or
household purposes.
"§ 75-150. Enforcement; remedies.
(a) The Attorney General shall have the same authority under this Article to investigate,
bring civil actions, seek injunctive relief, and obtain other remedies as provided under this
Chapter.
(b) In addition to any other relief authorized by law, a court may do any of the following
upon finding a violation of this Article:
(1) Enjoin the acquisition or continued ownership of a single-family home
acquired in violation of this Article.
(2) Order divestiture of a single-family home acquired in violation of this Article
within a reasonable period set by the court.
(3) Order disgorgement to the State of any rents, proceeds, appreciation, fees, or
other profits derived from a single-family home acquired or held in violation
of this Article.
(4) Award restitution, damages, costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(5) Impose a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per
home acquired in violation of this Article,
House Bill 1056-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) A court may join affiliates and other interested parties as necessary to ensure a full
accounting of ownership and effective enforcement of this Article.
(d) The remedies under this Article are cumulative and do not limit any other rights or
remedies available under law."
SECTION 4.2. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
acquisitions occurring on or after that date.

PART V. ESTABLISH WORKFORCE HOUSING PRECONSTRUCTION REVOLVING
LOAN PROGRAM
SECTION 5. Chapter 122A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 122A-5.17. Revolving loan fund to finance short-term workforce housing
preconstruction costs.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Preconstruction costs. – Land surveys, environmental due diligence and soil
testing, utility connections, planning and permit fees, and site clearing and
grading.
(2) Workforce housing. – Housing that is affordable to households earning
between sixty percent (60%) and one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the
county area median income or the State area median income, whichever is
higher.
(b) Program. – The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall establish and
administer the Workforce Housing Preconstruction Revolving Loan Program for the purpose of
making revolving loans for preconstruction costs for workforce housing projects before
developers obtain permanent, private financing. The Agency shall establish guidelines for project
equity requirements for applicants between twenty percent (20%) and thirty-five percent (35%)
based on market conditions in the county where the project is located. Funds appropriated to the
North Carolina Housing Trust Fund for the Workforce Housing Preconstruction Revolving Loan
Program shall be used by the Agency only as provided in this section.
(c) Requirements. – The following shall apply to loans issued pursuant to this section:
(1) No loan shall exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(2) Eighty percent (80%) of loans shall be reserved for projects in counties
designated as development tier one and tier two areas, as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(3) Twenty percent (20%) of loans shall be reserved for projects in counties
designated as a development tier three area, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08.
For the purposes of this subsection, the development tier designation that is in effect as of the
beginning of a fiscal year shall be applied for all loans issued for that fiscal year.
(d) Report. – Before February 15 of each year, the Agency shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government and the Fiscal Research Division on
the number of loans made under this section in the previous calendar year, the amount of each
loan, and the recipient of each loan."

PART VI. INCREASE FUNDING FOR NORTH CAROLINA HOUSING FINANCE
AGENCY
SECTION 6.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Housing Finance Agency the sum of one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year as a directed grant to establish the Municipal
Housing Approval Acceleration Program pursuant to this act.
SECTION 6.2. The State Controller shall transfer the sum of forty million dollars
($40,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year from funds available in the
Page 6 House Bill 1056-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Economic Development Project Reserve, established in Section 2.2 of S.L. 2021-180, to the
North Carolina Housing Trust Fund for the Workforce Housing Preconstruction Revolving Loan
Program established by this act.

PART VII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1056-First Edition Page 7